Utah statutes.
20A-5-702.   Destroying or concealing ballots.
(1)  It is unlawful for any person, or officer having charge of official
ballots, to destroy, suppress, or conceal them, except authorized by this
title.
(2)  Any person who violates this section is guilty of a felony, and shall be
punished by imprisonment in the state prison for not less than one year nor
more than five years.
